Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Collection of Debts Owed the Commonwealth
45.301.
General administrative functions of Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall have and exercise all administrative functions of the Commonwealth, except as otherwise provided by law, in relation to:

Developing financial policies and plans for consideration by the Governor as the basis for his budget recommendations to the General Assembly, and preparing the detailed documents in accordance with the financial plans of the Governor for presentation to the General Assembly.

Coordinating and supervising the fiscal affairs and fiscal procedures of the Commonwealth to insure the carrying out of the definite financial policies and plans approved by the General Assembly.

Accounting, including budgetary accounting and accounting control.

Fiscal reporting.

Supervision of preauditing of expenditures and current auditing of receipts and receivables.

Supervision of purchasing and storekeeping and control of property and stores.

Supervision of all receivables of the Commonwealth.

Maintaining and operating public buildings, except those provided for the exclusive use of any one (1) agency.

Auditing the accounts of the Treasurer and the Auditor of Public Accounts, as contemplated by Section 53 of the Constitution.

Coordination and supervision of data processing, computers, and government information systems.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall be primarily responsible for maintaining management control over the activities of the several budget units of the executive branch. To perform this function, the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall:

Keep in continuous touch with the operations, plans and needs of the budget units, and with the sources and amounts of revenue and other receipts of the Commonwealth.

Appraise the quantity and quality of services rendered by each budget unit of the executive branch and the needs for such services and for any new services.

Examine and recommend work programs and periodic allotments to the several budget units of the executive branch, and changes therein as provided by KRS

48.620

.

Develop plans for improvements and economies in organization and operation of the budget units of the executive branch, and install such plans as are approved or directed by the Governor or the General Assembly.

Devise and prescribe the forms of operations reports to be required periodically from each budget unit of the executive branch and require such budget units to make such reports.

Examine and comment on all statements and reports on the financial condition, estimated future financial condition and operation of state government and its budget units.

Receive and deal with all requests for information as to financial conditions and operations of the Commonwealth.

Prepare such unit costs and cost statistics as are required from time to time.

Advise and assist the Governor, the Chief Justice, the General Assembly, the appropriations committees of the General Assembly and the Legislative Research Commission, upon request, in any matters relating to the functions of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

Keep a summary of the financial transactions of all budget units.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 31, effective July 1, 1983.

45.305.
Accounting system — Fund structure.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall install a unified and integrated system of accounts for the state which shall comply with generally accepted accounting principles, and which shall be in addition to other accounts required by this chapter, and which shall include:

A set of budgetary control accounts for each fund, comprising an account with the available cash of the fund, an account with the budget estimate of the amount of money to be derived from each source of revenue and nonrevenue receipts, an account with the total of the unallotted balances of appropriations, an account with the total of the free balances of allotments, an account with the total commitments under allotments, and an account with the estimated cash surplus or deficit, so as to show at all times the status of the budget fund.

A subsidiary appropriation ledger for each fund from which appropriations are made, embracing an account with each appropriation, and designed to show the budget unit to which the appropriation was made, the purpose of the appropriation, the amount appropriated, the additions to the appropriation, the allotments from the appropriation, the unallotted balance of the appropriation, the commitments charged to allotments, and the free balances of the total amount allotted.

A set of general controlling proprietary and operating accounts for each fund, so as to record the transactions to the fund in summary form and to show the actual current assets, prepaid expenses, current liabilities, deferred credits to income, reserves, actual income, actual expenditures, and the current surplus or deficit.

A uniform classification of the sources of revenue and nonrevenue receipts.

Standard classifications of the expenditures of the budget units.

A standard classification of the budget units.

Such other accounts, records, and devices as the Finance and Administration Cabinet deems necessary for the production of needed information respecting financial condition, financial operations and costs.

The accounts provided for in paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of subsection (1) of this section or summary records shall be maintained by the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall keep controlling accounts with receipts, payments, and state depositories. The cabinet shall obtain from the State Treasurer the figures for the entries required to open the accounts, and thereafter it shall obtain the information required for the keeping of the accounts from deposits, lists of warrants drawn under appropriations, and vouchers requesting transfers of deposits among state depositories.

The accounting system prescribed and installed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall provide for the settlement of transactions between budget units by making debit and credit entries on the books of the cabinet on the basis of adequate expenditure vouchers, without the issuance of warrants.

The accounting system prescribed and installed by the Finance and Administration Cabinet shall include the following fund classifications:

Governmental fund: This classification shall include those funds through which most governmental functions typically are financed including, but not limited to, the general fund, the road fund, bond debt related fund, federal fund, agency receipts funds, and the capital construction fund.

Proprietary fund: This classification shall account for governmental activities which are similar to those activities found in the private sector. Activities which provide services to other governmental units and activities which provide services principally to the private sector are included.

Fiduciary fund: This classification shall account for assets held by a governmental unit in a trustee capacity or as an agent for individuals, private organizations, other governmental units, or other funds. These include expendable trust funds, nonexpendable trust funds, pension trust funds and agency funds.

Loan fund: This classification shall account for funds advanced or to be advanced to other governments, other governmental agencies, or private organizations or individuals.

Account groups. In order to establish accounting control and accountability for general fixed assets and the unmatured principal of general long-term debt, a general fixed assets account group and a general long-term debt account group may be established.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 32, effective July 1, 1983; 1998, ch. 118, § 16, effective July 15, 1998.

45.306.
Formats for state financial administration.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall examine all formats used or proposed for use by any budget unit for the purposes specified in this section, and shall design or redesign them with a view to providing for the simplification, unification, and integration of financial and business administrative records and procedures. This section shall apply to all financial and nonfinancial electronic commerce standards to ensure consistent internal control and system integration in accordance with Commonwealth information technology architecture for use in accounting, preauditing, State Treasury administration, personnel administration, purchasing, property control, and other matters of financial and business administration of the state or any budget unit thereof, with the exception of uniform forms for use in the preparation of budget estimates, requests, and recommendations provided for by KRS

48.040

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 33, effective July 1, 1983; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 18, effective May 30, 1997.

45.310.
Account of warrants and records of State Treasurer’s receipts.

The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall keep an accurate account of all warrants and certificates drawn or issued by the cabinet, showing in due succession the date and amount of each warrant, and for what and to whom issued. The cabinet shall also keep records of all receipts paid into the State Treasury.

History.

149, 153: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1); 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 19, effective May 30, 1997; 1998, ch. 118, § 17, effective July 15, 1998.

45.313.
Inventories.

Each budget unit shall maintain a current inventory of equipment having an original cost of five hundred dollars ($500) or more. The inventory shall be available for examination by the Finance and Administration Cabinet at all times.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 450, § 40, effective July 1, 1983; 1988, ch. 74, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1997 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 4, § 20, effective May 30, 1997.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Inventory of equipment of state police, KRS

16.070

.

45.320.
Fiscal reporting. [Repealed.]

45.321.
Receivable accounts. [Repealed.]

45.322.
Accounting system fund structure. [Repealed.]

45.330.
Power of the department of finance to make investigations and secure evidence. [Repealed.]

45.340.
Checks for salaries — When to be issued.

Except where otherwise provided by law, checks for salaries due to public officers and employees shall be issued weekly, semimonthly, monthly or for such other period of time not exceeding thirty (30) days which may be designated by the Finance and Administration Cabinet with the approval of the Governor. Checks shall be tendered to an officer or employee only after he has completed the work for which he is being paid and not later than fifteen (15) days after the designated pay period. The Finance and Administration Cabinet is authorized to effect such changes in the payroll system at any time as are necessary to pay salaries after work has been performed. The cabinet is further authorized to make such changes as are necessary and desirable in the posting of payroll expenditures and any other accounting and reporting procedures. In connection with such changes in accounting and reporting procedures, KRS

45.231

shall not be construed to prevent the issuance of salary checks for services rendered during a preceding fiscal year.

History.

156: amend. Acts 1954, ch. 244, § 5; 1964, ch. 135; 1974, ch. 74, Art. II, § 9(1).

45.345.
Authorization of electronic payment methods for deposit in State Treasury — Provider fees.

In addition to any payment method authorized by law, and notwithstanding any statute to the contrary, any state agency may accept the following methods of payment to secure funds for deposit into the State Treasury:

Credit card;

Debit card;

Electronic check;

Automated clearinghouse (ACH) debit; or

Any other electronic payment method upon the prior written approval of both the Finance and Administration Cabinet and the Office of the State Treasurer.

Any fees charged to a state agency by the provider of the payment services listed in subsection (1) of this section shall be deemed to represent collection expenses and may be considered normal operating expenses of the agency, or the agency may collect convenience fees from users to supplement agency costs of delivering services.

History.

Enact. Acts 2003, ch. 191, § 1, effective June 24, 2003.